District of Columbia statutes.
37-201.19

Sale of shucked oysters, fish, meat, butter, and cheese.

Shucked oysters shall be sold only by liquid measure or numerical count, and whenever there is included in the sale by measure of shucked oysters more than 10 per centum of oyster liquid or other liquid substance, the vendor shall be deemed guilty of selling short measure. All fish, meat, poultry, meat products, lard, lard substitutes, butter, butter substitutes, and cheese shall be sold by avoirdupois weight.

Mar. 3, 1921, 41 Stat. 1223, ch. 118, § 19
Apr. 27, 1945, 59 Stat. 99, ch. 99, § 6
1981 Ed., § 10-121.
1973 Ed., § 10-120.